Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 1 General Provisions

53-4-1.
Power of testator.

A testator, by will, may make any disposition of property that is not inconsistent with the laws or contrary to the public policy of the state and may give all the property to strangers, to the exclusion of the testator’s spouse and descendants.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Law reviews.

For article discussing the pretermitted heir, see 10 Ga. L. Rev. 447 (1976).

For note, “Preventing Spousal Disinheritance in Georgia,” see 19 Ga. L. Rev. 427 (1984).

53-4-2.
When will takes effect.

A will shall take effect instantly upon the death of the testator however long probate may be postponed.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Law reviews.

For comment on Jenkins v. United States, 296 F. Supp. 203 (M.D. Ga. 1968), see 3 Ga. L. Rev. 766 (1969).

For annual survey of law of wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 457 (2004).

53-4-3.
Determination whether instrument is will.

No particular form is necessary to constitute a will. To determine whether an instrument is a will, the test is the intention of the maker to be gathered from the whole instrument, read in light of the surrounding circumstances. If the intention is to convey a present interest, though the possession is postponed until after death, the instrument is not a will. If the intention is to convey an interest accruing and having effect only at death, the instrument is a will.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-4-4.
Incorporation of extrinsic documents into will.

Any writing in existence when a will is executed may be incorporated into the will by reference if the language of the will manifests this intent and describes the writing sufficiently to permit its identification.

This Code section shall not be construed to imply that the common law does not permit the incorporation of an extrinsic document into a will by reference in the manner authorized under subsection (a) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-13/HB 865.

Effective date.

This Code section became effective January 1, 2021.

Editor’s notes.

For application of this statute in 2021, see Executive Orders 06.30.21.02, 07.22.21.02, 08.19.21.02, and 09.20.21.02.

Law reviews.

For article with annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 73 Mercer L. Rev. 281 (2021).

53-4-5.
Written statement or list disposing of items of tangible personal property.

A written statement or list meeting the requirements of subsection (b) of this Code section shall dispose of items of tangible personal property, other than money, not otherwise specifically disposed of by the testator’s will. If more than one otherwise effective writing exists, then, to the extent of any conflict among the writings, the provisions of a more recent writing revoke the inconsistent provisions of each prior writing.

A written statement or list meets the requirements of this subsection if such writing:

Is signed and dated by the testator;

Describes the items and the beneficiaries with reasonable certainty; and

Is referred to in the testator’s will.

The writing may be referred to as one to be in existence at the time of the testator’s death; it may be prepared before or after the execution of the will; it may be altered by the testator after its preparation, provided that it is signed and dated on the date of such alteration; and it may be a writing that has no significance apart from its effect on the dispositions made by the will.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-13/HB 865.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective January 1, 2021.